District of Columbia statutes.
24-231.09

Status of prisoners with respect to prison industries.

Prisoners who apply and are eligible for employment in a prison industry shall have no right to obtain employment in the industry. Prisoners employed in a prison industry shall not be regarded as having any right concerning that employment, shall not be regarded as District employees or employees of a private-sector employer, and shall not be regarded as having any rights or privileges accorded to District government employees or employees of a private-sector employer other than those expressly set forth in this subchapter.

History

May 8, 1996, D.C. Law 11-117, § 10, 43 DCR 1179
May 22, 1998, D.C. Law 12-114, § 4, 45 DCR 486

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 24-458.9.